Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.120

Name—Listing of shareholders.

Corporations organized pursuant to this chapter shall render professional service and exercise its authorized powers under a name permitted by law and the professional ethics of the profession in which the corporation is so engaged. The corporate name of a professional service corporation must comply with the requirements of Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW. With the filing of its first annual report and any filings thereafter, a professional service corporation shall list its then shareholders.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9120; 1993 c 290 s 1; 1982 c 35 s 169; 1969 c 122 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.